Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.370

Investigations—Statement of facts relating to investigation may be permitted—Publication of information—Use of criminal history record information.

(1) The director in his or her discretion (a) may annually, or more frequently, make such public or private investigations within or without this state as the director deems necessary to determine whether any registration should be granted, denied or revoked or whether any person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the adoption of rules and forms under this chapter, (b) may engage in the detection and identification of criminal activities subject to this chapter, (c) may require or permit any person to testify or to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the director may determine, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated, and (d) may publish information concerning a proceeding, an investigation, or any violation of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter, if the director determines it is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(2) The enforcement unit of the securities division of the department of financial institutions may be authorized to receive criminal history record information in connection with the investigation of criminal activities subject to this chapter.

[ 2002 c 65 s 6; 1998 c 15 s 17; 1994 c 256 s 21; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 25; 1973 1st ex.s. c 171 s 2; 1959 c 282 s 37.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Investigations, additional authority, scope: RCW 21.20.700.